nb: Standard balltre: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little league; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; USA balltrestandard; USSSA; Annet
fr: Batte standard: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Petite ligue; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Norme bat américaine; USSSA; Autre
bg-BG: Стандарт на бухалката: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Малка лига; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Американски стандарт на бухалката; USSSA; Други
sl-SI: Standard za kije: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Mala liga; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Standard za palice v ZDA; USSSA; Drug
sv: Slagträ standard: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little league; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; USA bat standard; USSSA; Övrigt
hr-HR: Standard za palice: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little league; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Američki standard za palice; USSSA; Ostalo
cs: Standard pálky: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Malá liga; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Standard pálky USA; USSSA; Jiné
pl: Standard BAT: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Mała liga; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Amerykański standard kija; USSSA; Inne
it: Mazza standard: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little league; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Standard bat USA; USSSA; Altro
es: Modelo de bate: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Pequeña liga; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Bates estándar de Estados Unidos; USSSA; Otros
zh-TW: 球棒標準: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; 小聯盟; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; 美國棒球球棒標準; USSSA; 其他
lt-LT: Beisbolo lazdos standartas: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Mažoji lyga; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; JAV beisbolo lazdos standartas; USSSA; Kita
th: ไม้เบสบอลมาตรฐาน: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; ลีกขนาดเล็ก; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; มาตรฐานไม้เบสบอลสหรัฐฯ; USSSA; อื่นๆ
da: Batstandard: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Børneliga; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Amerikansk batstandard; USSSA; Andet
pt-PT: Padrão do taco: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little League; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Taco padrão USA; USSSA; Outro
el: Κοινό πρότυπο μπαστουνιών: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little League; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Αμερικανικό πρότυπο ροπάλου; USSSA; Άλλο
ko: 배트 표준: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; 리틀 리그; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; 미국 배트 표준; USSSA; 기타
tr: Sopa Standardı: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Küçük lig; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; ABD bat standardı; USSSA; Diğer
hu: Ütő szabványa: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Kispályás; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; USA-ütőszabvány; USSSA; Egyéb
sk-SK: Štandard pálky: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Malá liga; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Pálka podľa štandardov USA; USSSA; Iné
pt-BR: Padrão BAT: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little league; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Taco padrão USA; USSSA; Outro
de: Schlägerstandard: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little League; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; US-amerikanischer Schlägerstandard; USSSA; Sonstiges
nl: Knuppelstandaard: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little league; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; USA bat standard; USSSA; Andere
fi: Mailastandardi: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little league; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; USA Bat Standard; USSSA; Muu
ru: Стандарт сертификации биты: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Малая лига; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Стандарт США для бит; USSSA; Другое
zh-CN: 球棒标准: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; 小联盟; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; 美国球棒标准; USSSA; 其他
vi: Tiêu chuẩn gậy: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Giải đấu nhỏ; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; Tiêu chuẩn vòng đấu Hoa Kỳ; USSSA; Khác
ro-RO: Standard bâtă: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little League; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; USA Bat Standard; USSSA; Altele
en: Bat standard: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; Little league; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; USA bat standard; USSSA; Other
ja: バット規格: ASA; BBCOR; BESR; ISA; ISF; リトルリーグ; NCAA; NFHS; NSA; USAバット規格; USSSA; その他